South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3465.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 25, Chapter 6, Title 12 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 12-6-3830. (A) For purposes of this section: (1) "Food desert" means an area in which at least thirty-three percent of the population lives more than one mile from a grocery store or supermarket. (2) "Grocer" means a retail establishment that sells primarily fruits, vegetables, meats, dairy products, and whole grains. (B) A grocer that opens a new location in a food desert is eligible for a tax credit equal to ten percent of the total costs incurred in establishing the new location. The tax credit must be claimed over a period of three years, with equal installments due in each of the three years following the year in which the new location opens. (C) Any grocer seeking to claim the tax credit provided in this section shall submit an application to the department. The application must include a detailed plan for the new location, including its location, size, and product offerings. The department shall review the application and approve or deny it based on the grocer's ability to meet the requirements of this section. SECTION 2.  Section 12-36-2120 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (85) all purchases made for the purpose of stocking and operating a new grocer located in a food desert, as defined in Section 12-6-3810, for a period of two years. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----